Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1604
Municipal utility; owned and operated by a village; discontinuance of service; conference; notice; procedure.

Prior to the discontinuance of service to any domestic subscriber by a municipal utility owned and operated by a village, the domestic subscriber, upon request, shall be provided a conference with the board of trustees of the village. A municipal utility owned and operated by a village shall not be subject to sections 70-1608 to 70-1614, but the board of trustees shall establish a procedure to resolve utility bills when a conference is requested by a domestic subscriber. The procedure shall be in writing and a copy of such procedure shall be furnished upon the request of any domestic subscriber. The board of trustees shall notify the domestic subscriber of the time, place, and date scheduled for such conference.

Laws 1979, LB 143, § 17;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 19-2717;

Laws 1988, LB 792, § 4.